Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.50
Office of the Nebraska Capitol Commission; identify and locate original capitol furniture.

The Office of the Nebraska Capitol Commission shall identify all furniture originally purchased for the State Capitol. The office shall review the inventories and physical spaces of all agencies, boards, and commissions of the legislative, executive, and judicial branches to locate each item. From the items identified and located, the office shall establish a classification system identifying each item by style, type, and condition.

Laws 1980, LB 885, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 27.